California statutes. Water Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as otherwise previously provided for in a contract agreed to by the customer and the City of West Covina, if the purchaser, contractor, or lessee of, or successor to, all or a portion of the water utility owned by the City of West Covina is a retail water supplier that is regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, rates for recycled or nonpotable water service to a closed hazardous waste and solid waste facility located within the boundaries of the City of West Covina for the purposes of irrigation, recreation, or dust suppression or any other use at that facility shall be established in accordance with subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 13580.7, and if there is a failure to agree on
 the terms and conditions of a recycled or nonpotable water supply agreement for the delivery of water for those purposes by that purchaser, contractor, lessee, or successor, Section 13581 shall apply.

(b) For the purpose of this section, nonpotable water that is not the result of the treatment of waste shall be treated as the equivalent of recycled water if it is suitable for a direct beneficial use or a controlled use that would not otherwise occur and is therefor considered a valuable resource, if the use of that water will not adversely affect downstream water rights, degrade water quality, or be injurious to plant life, fish, or wildlife, as provided by statute or by regulations of the State Department of Public Health and the state board or a regional board, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 49.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13581.

(a) If there is a failure to agree on terms and conditions of a recycled water supply agreement involving a retail water supplier that is a public agency within 180 days from the date of the receipt of a request for recycled water pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13580, a written statement pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13580.5, or a determination of availability pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13580.5, any party may request a formal mediation process. The parties shall commence mediation within 60 days after the mediation request is made. If the parties cannot agree on a mediator, the director shall appoint a mediator. The mediator may recommend to the parties appropriate terms and conditions applicable to the service of recycled water. The cost for the services of the mediator shall be divided equally among the parties to the mediation and shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(b) If the parties in mediation reach agreement, both parties together shall draft the contract for the recycled water service. The parties shall sign the contract within 30 days.

(c) If the parties in mediation fail to reach agreement, the affected retail water supplier shall, within 30 days, by resolution or ordinance, adopt a rate for recycled water service. The agency action shall be subject to validating proceedings pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Part 2 of Title 10 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that there shall not be a presumption in favor of the retail water supplier under the action taken to set the rate for recycled water service. The mediator shall file a report with the superior court setting forth the recommendations provided to the parties regarding appropriate terms and conditions applicable to the service of recycled water. Each party shall bear its own costs and attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 753, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13581.2.

If the retail water supplier is regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, and there is a failure to agree on terms and conditions of a recycle water supply agreement with a customer within 180 days from the date of the receipt of a request for recycled water pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13580, a written statement pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13580.5, or a determination of availability pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13580.5, the matter shall be submitted to the Public Utilities Commission for resolution, and the commission shall determine a contract rate or rates for recycled water as provided in Section 13580.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 753, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13582.

This chapter is not intended to alter either of the following:

(a) Any rights, remedies, or obligations which may exist pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1210) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of this code or Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 1501) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Any rates established or contracts entered into prior to January 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 753, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13583.

(a) If a retail water supplier that is a public agency does not comply with this chapter, the customer may petition a court for a writ of mandate pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) If a retail water supplier is regulated by the Public Utilities Commission and does not comply with this chapter, the Public Utilities Commission may order the retailer to comply with this chapter after receiving a petition from the customer specifying the provisions of this chapter with which the retailer has failed to comply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 753, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Federal Assistance for Treatment Facilities [13600. - 13609.]

13600.

The state board shall administer any program of financial assistance for water quality control which may be delegated to it by law, and may accept funds from the United States or any person to that end.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13601.

The state board, in cooperation with the regional boards, shall survey the statewide need for waste collection, treatment and disposal facilities which will be required during the five-year period, January 1, 1968, to December 31, 1972, inclusive, to adequately protect the waters of the state for beneficial use. The state board shall also, biennially, commencing in 1970, survey the need for facilities which will be required by public agencies for the ensuing five-year period. The state board may request a local public agency operating such facilities to transmit to its regional board a report on the following:

(a) A summary of the construction or improvement of its waste collection, treatment and disposal facilities and amounts expended therefor.

(b) An estimate of its needs for the five-year period, January 1, 1968, to December 31, 1972, inclusive, and for any ensuing five-year period.

The state board shall review the information contained in the reports made by the local public agencies. The state board shall submit to the Legislature findings and conclusions as to the anticipated local, state, and federal financing necessary to provide the needed facilities for such periods.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13602.

The state board shall make no commitment or enter into any agreement pursuant to an exercise of authority under this chapter until it has determined that any money required to be furnished as the state’s share of project cost is available for such purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13603.

The Governor may request the funds required to finance the state’s share of project costs for each fiscal year through inclusion of the anticipated state’s share in the annual Budget Bill.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13604.

The state board shall review and approve each waste collection, treatment, and disposal project for which an application for a grant under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act has been made. The state board shall, in reviewing each project, determine whether such project is in conformity with state policy for water quality control and in conformity with water quality control plans adopted by regional boards, and shall certify that such project is entitled to priority over other eligible projects on the basis of financial as well as water pollution control needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 254.)
-------------------------------------------

13605.

For the purpose of reviewing applications for grants made pursuant to authority granted in Section 13600, the state board shall give added consideration to applicants having facilities providing optimum water recycling and use of recycled water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13606.

If an application states that the applicant is not able to finance the local agency share of the project, the state board shall consider whether the applicant should be required to levy a sewerage service charge. If the state board determines a sewerage service charge is necessary to pay such costs, the state board shall not approve the grant application unless, as a condition to such approval, the applicant agrees to levy a reasonable and equitable sewerage service charge in connection with the proposed project.

Any such applicant, not otherwise authorized, is authorized by this section to levy a sewerage service charge pursuant to such an agreement, and shall levy such charge in the manner provided in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13607.

All money appropriated by the Legislature for the state’s share of the project costs shall be appropriated without regard to fiscal years, or shall augment an appropriation without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13608.

After the effective date of the amendment of this section by the 1972 Regular Session of the Legislature, no application for a grant under this division or under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, or amendment thereof, or for a loan pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 13400) of this division, shall be accepted by the state board unless such application contains assurances that supervisors and operators of the plant meet or will meet certification requirements, adopted pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 13625) of this division, for the proposed plant, as well as the plant in current operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1315.)
-------------------------------------------

13609.

The money in the State Clean Water Grants Administration Revolving Fund is transferred to the State Clean Water Fund to pay, upon appropriation, for administrative costs relating to adjustments of grant processing fees paid pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.5. Perchlorate [13610. - 13613.]

13610.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), “perchlorate” means all perchlorate-containing compounds, including ammonium, potassium, magnesium, and sodium perchlorate.

(2) Perchlorate does not include perchlorate located in unused military munitions, as defined in Section 260.10 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that were stored on or after January 1, 2004.

(b) Subject to Section 13610.5, “perchlorate storage facility” means a facility, not including a military munitions storage facility within a military installation that meets the Department of Defense Explosive Safety Board requirements set forth in DOD 6055.9-STD (Department of Defense Ammunition and Explosives Safety Standards), that stores over 500 pounds of perchlorate in any calendar year.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “military munitions storage facility” does not include the entire military installation within which the military munitions storage facility is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 508, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13610.5.

This chapter does not apply to the following:

(a) A facility that stores perchlorate for retail purposes or for law enforcement purposes.

(b) Drinking water storage reservoirs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 614, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13611.

(a) The notification required by Section 13611.5 does not apply to a discharge that is in compliance with this division, or to a water agency conveying water in compliance with all state and federal drinking water standards.

(b) Any person who fails to provide the notifications required by Section 13271 relating to perchlorate or by Section 13611.5 may be civilly liable in accordance with subdivision (c).

(c) (1) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by a regional board in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5 for a violation described in subdivision (b) in an amount that does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(2) Civil liability may be imposed by the superior court in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 13350) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 13360) of Chapter 5 for a violation described in subdivision (b) in an amount that is not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), for each day in which the violation occurs.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 13441, all moneys collected by the state pursuant to this section shall be available to the state board upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 679.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13611.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2005, and annually thereafter, unless the owner or operator has met the alternative compliance requirements of subdivision (b), an owner or operator of a storage facility that has stored in any calendar year since January 1, 1950, over 500 pounds of perchlorate shall submit to the state board, to the extent feasible, all of the following information:

(1) The volume of perchlorate stored each year.

(2) The method of storage.

(3) The location of storage. To the extent authorized by federal law, in the case of a perchlorate storage facility under the control of the Armed
 Forces of the United States, “location” means the name and address of the property within which the perchlorate storage facility is located.

(4) Copies of documents relating to any monitoring undertaken for potential leaks into the water bodies of the state.

(b) The owner or operator of a storage facility that has stored in any calendar year since January 1, 1950, over 500 pounds of perchlorate, is in compliance with this section if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The owner or operator has provided substantially similar information as required pursuant to subdivision (a) to a state, local, or federal agency pursuant to any of the following:

(A) An order issued by a regional board pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13300) of
 Division 7.

(B) An order, consent order, or consent decree issued or entered into by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) An order, consent order, or consent decree issued or entered into by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq.).

(D) The requirement under Section 25504.1 of the Health and Safety Code, as added by Assembly Bill 826 of the 2003–04 Regular Session.

(2) The owner or operator, on or before January 1, 2005, and annually thereafter, notifies the state board of the governmental entity to which
 the information is provided and the state board determines the information supplied is substantially similar as the information required to be reported pursuant to subdivision (a). In the case of any information submitted to a federal or local agency, the state board may require the owner or operator, in addition, to submit that information to the state board if the state board determines that the information is not otherwise reasonably available to the state board.

(c) This section shall not be administered or implemented if the state board receives notification from the Secretary for Environmental Protection pursuant to Section 13613 that the Secretary for Environmental Protection has established a database that is able to receive perchlorate inventory information.

(d) Information on perchlorate storage need only be submitted pursuant to this section one time, unless information
 originally submitted pursuant to this section has changed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 128.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

13612.

(a) The state board shall publish and make available to the public on or before January 1, 2006, a list of past and present perchlorate storage facilities within the state. The state board may charge an annual fee to each owner of a storage facility that provides information to the board for that purpose, which fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each year information is provided. The fees shall be deposited in the State Water Quality Control Fund, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall be available to the state board upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) The state board shall compile and maintain centrally all information obtained pursuant to Section 13611.5. The information shall be available for public review.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 614, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13613.

Upon notification from the Secretary for Environmental Protection that he or she has established a database that is able to receive perchlorate inventory information pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 25404 of the Health and Safety Code, the state board shall submit to the Secretary for Environmental Protection all perchlorate storage information obtained pursuant to Section 13611.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 614, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Waste Water Treatment Plant Classification and Operator Certification [13625. - 13633.]

13625.

As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Chief plant operator” means the person designated by the owner of the wastewater treatment plant as the person responsible for the overall operation of the wastewater treatment plant, including compliance with effluent limitations established in the wastewater treatment plant’s waste discharge requirements.

(b) “Operates” means actions or decisions to control performance or outcome of one or more wastewater treatment processes and includes the supervision of any other person who acts or makes decisions to
 control the performance or outcome of one or more wastewater treatment processes.

(c) “Wastewater certificate” means a certificate of competency issued by the state board stating that a person has met the requirements to be certified for a specific classification and grade level in the certification program. At a minimum, wastewater certificate classifications shall include operators and operators-in-training.

(d) (1) “Wastewater treatment plant” means any of the following:

(A) Any facility owned by a state, local, or federal agency and used in the treatment or reclamation of sewage or industrial wastes.

(B) Any privately owned facility
 used in the treatment or reclamation of sewage or industrial wastes, and regulated by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Sections 216 and 230.6 of, and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 701) of Part 1 of Division 1 of, the Public Utilities Code.

(C) Any privately owned facility used primarily in the treatment or reclamation of sewage for which the state board or a regional board has issued waste discharge requirements.

(2) “Wastewater treatment plant” does not include onsite sewage treatment systems as regulated by the state board
 or a regional water quality control board pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 13290).

(e) “Wastewater treatment process” means a process that improves the quality of wastewater before it is discharged from a wastewater treatment plant and includes all of the following:

(1) Use of preliminary, primary, pond, secondary, or tertiary treatment for liquid-solids separation of wastewater.

(2) Use of disinfection to inactivate or destroy pathogens in wastewater.

(3) Use of solids treatment for solids stabilization and volume reduction before removal from the wastewater treatment plant site.

(f) “Water treatment operator certificate” has the same meaning as defined in Section 106876 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) “Water recycling treatment plant” means a wastewater treatment plant that further treats secondary or tertiary effluent, or both, for the purpose of meeting the uniform statewide recycling criteria established pursuant to Section 13521 for the use of recycled water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 19.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13625.1.

(a) The state board may exempt from the requirements of this chapter any facility that is classified as a Class 1 plant by the state board under Section 3675 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations, and the facility could not, due to operator error, violate water quality objectives.

(b) An exemption granted pursuant to this section is valid for four years, and may be renewed by the state board upon request.

(c) The state board may condition an exemption under this section, and the exemption may be terminated at any time by the board.

(d) The state board may charge a reasonable administrative fee for processing a facility’s original or renewal application for exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 422, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13626.

The state board shall classify types of wastewater treatment plants for the purpose of determining the levels of competence necessary to operate them. The state board shall adopt regulations setting forth the types of plants and the factors on which the state board based its classification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 20.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13627.

(a) Except as provided in Section 13625.1 and subdivision (b), a person who operates a wastewater treatment plant shall possess a valid, unexpired wastewater certificate of the appropriate grade.

(b) A person who operates a water recycling treatment plant may comply with subdivision (a) by possessing a valid, unexpired water treatment operator certificate of the appropriate grade.

(c) (1) All wastewater certificates shall be issued in accordance with regulations adopted by the state board. The state board shall develop and specify in its regulations the training necessary to qualify a person for a
 wastewater certificate for each type and class of plant. The state board may accept experience in lieu of qualification training.

(2) The state board shall evaluate opportunities for the following:

(A) Issuing a wastewater certificate by examination waiver to persons who performed duties comparable to the duties of an operator at a wastewater treatment plant while serving in the United States military.

(B) Award experience and education credits to persons who performed duties comparable to the duties of an operator at a wastewater treatment plant while serving in the United States military.

(3) The state board shall seek consultation with the United
 States Department of Defense in carrying out paragraph (2).

(4) If the state board identifies opportunities pursuant to paragraph (2), the state board shall, where appropriate, issue a wastewater certificate by examination waiver or award experience or education credits to persons who performed duties comparable to the duties of an operator at a wastewater treatment plant while serving in the United States military.

(d) The state board may refuse to grant, suspend, or revoke any wastewater certificate, or may place on
 probation or reprimand the certificate holder, upon any reasonable ground, including, but not limited to, all of the following reasons:

(1) Submitting false or misleading information on an application for a wastewater certificate or an examination for a wastewater certificate.

(2) The employment of fraud or deception in the course of operating the wastewater treatment plant.

(3) A wastewater certificate holder’s failure to use reasonable care or judgment in the operation of the plant.

(4) A wastewater certificate holder’s inability to perform operating duties properly.

(5) Willfully or negligently violating, or causing or allowing the violation of, waste discharge requirements or permits issued pursuant to the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) or this division.

(6) Engaging in dishonest conduct during an examination for a wastewater certificate.

(e) The state board shall conduct all proceedings for the refusal to grant a wastewater certificate, and
 suspension or revocation of a
 certificate pursuant to subdivision (d), in accordance with the rules adopted pursuant to Section 185.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 760, Sec. 3.   (AB 1588)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13627.1.

(a) Any person who commits either of the following violations is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be liable civilly in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of violation:

(1) Operates a wastewater treatment plant that is not a water recycling treatment plant but does not hold a valid, unexpired wastewater certificate of the appropriate grade issued pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Operates a water recycling treatment plant but does not hold either a valid, unexpired wastewater certificate of the appropriate grade issued pursuant to this chapter or a valid,
 unexpired water treatment operator certificate of the appropriate grade.

(b) Any person or entity who commits either of the following violations is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be liable civilly in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of violation:

(1) Owns or operates a wastewater treatment plant that is not a water recycling treatment plant that employs, or allows the employment of, any person who operates the wastewater treatment plant but does not hold a valid, unexpired wastewater certificate of the appropriate grade issued pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Owns or operates a water recycling treatment plant that employs, or allows the employment of, any person who operates the water
 recycling treatment plant but does not hold a valid, unexpired wastewater certificate of the appropriate grade issued pursuant to this chapter or a valid, unexpired water treatment operator certificate of the appropriate grade.

(c) Any person who commits any of the acts listed in paragraph (2), (3), (5), or (6) of subdivision (d) of Section 13627 or paragraph (3) or (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 13627.3 may be liable civilly in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 22.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13627.2.

Any person who submits to the state board false or misleading information on an application for a wastewater certificate, on an application for an examination for a wastewater certificate, or on an application for registration may be liable civilly in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 23.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13627.3.

(a) Any person or entity that contracts with the owner of a wastewater treatment plant to operate that plant shall register with the state board, and shall, within a year after the registration or the renewal of the registration, and annually thereafter, prepare and submit to the state board a report with all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the person or entity.

(2) The name and address of the wastewater treatment plants that the person or entity operates, or has operated during the preceding year, and the name of the applicable regional board that oversees
 each wastewater treatment plant.

(3) The name and grade of each wastewater treatment plant operator employed at each plant.

(4) Other information that the state board requires.

(b) The state board shall, by regulation, prescribe the procedures, and requirements for, registration pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The state board may refuse to grant, and may suspend or revoke, any registration issued by the state board pursuant to this section for good cause, including, but not limited to, any of the following reasons:

(1) The submission of false or misleading information on an application for
 registration.

(2) (A) Employment of a person to operate a wastewater treatment plant that is not a water recycling treatment plant who does not hold a valid, unexpired wastewater certificate of the appropriate grade.

(B) Employment of a person to operate a water recycling treatment plant who does not hold either a valid, unexpired wastewater certificate of the appropriate grade issued pursuant to this chapter or a valid, unexpired water treatment operator certificate of the appropriate grade.

(3) Willfully or negligently causing or allowing a violation of waste discharge requirements or permits issued pursuant to the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) or this division.

(4) Failure to meet the registration requirements prescribed by the state board pursuant to subdivision (b).

(5) Failure to use reasonable care in the management or operation of the wastewater treatment plant.

(d) The state board shall conduct all proceedings relating to the refusal to grant, or the suspension or revocation of, registration pursuant to subdivision (c) in accordance with the rules adopted pursuant to Section 185.

(e) The state board shall establish a fee schedule to pay for its costs to implement this section.

(f) Any person or entity that fails to comply with subdivision (a) is
 guilty of a misdemeanor and may be civilly liable in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 24.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13627.4.

(a) The state board may administratively impose the civil liability described in Section 13627.1, 13627.2, or 13627.3 in accordance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5.

(b) A remedy under this chapter is in addition to, and does not supersede or limit, any other remedy, civil or criminal, except that liability is not recoverable against an operator under subdivision (c) of Section 13627.1 for a violation for which liability is recovered against the operator under Section 13350 or 13385.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 51.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13627.6.

The state board, by regulation, shall prescribe the procedures and requirements for designation of a person as the chief plant operator and the duties that a chief plant operator is required to perform.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 26.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13628.

(a) Wastewater certificates issued or renewed pursuant to this chapter on or after January 1, 2017, shall be renewed triennially, subject to compliance by applicants with renewal requirements prescribed by regulations.

(b) Fees shall be payable to the state board at the time of issuance of a wastewater certificate and at the time of renewal. The state board shall establish a fee schedule to provide revenues that shall not exceed the amount necessary, but shall be sufficient, to recover all the costs of this program.

(c) The state board may establish reduced fees for the issuance or
 renewal of a wastewater certificate for applicants who hold a valid, unexpired water treatment operator certificate or a valid, unexpired water distribution operator certificate.

(d) The state board shall set the amount of total revenue collected each year through the fee schedules established pursuant to this chapter at an amount equal to the amount appropriated by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act from the Wastewater Operator Certification Fund for expenditure for the administration of this chapter, taking into account the reserves in the fund. The state board shall review the fees each fiscal year and revise the fees as necessary to conform with the amounts appropriated by the Legislature. If the state board determines that the revenue collected during the preceding year was greater than, or less than, the amounts appropriated by
 the Legislature, the state board may further adjust the fees to compensate for the overcollection or undercollection of the revenue.

(e) The state board may adopt regulations pursuant to this section, including any subsequent adjustments to the fees or subsequent amendments to the regulations, as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these emergency regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted by the state board, or any
 adjustment to the fees made by the state board pursuant to this section, shall remain in effect until revised by the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 27.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13628.5.

(a) The Wastewater Operator Certification Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) All of the following moneys shall be deposited in the Wastewater Operator Certification Fund:

(1) Any moneys made available by the Legislature for the purposes of the fund.

(2) Fees collected pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, all interest earned upon moneys that are deposited in the fund.

(c) The
 state board may expend the moneys in the Wastewater Operator Certification Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of administering this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 28.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13629.

The state board may approve courses of instruction at higher educational institutions that will qualify operators for each grade of certification. The state board shall also approve courses of instruction given by professional associations, or other private or public agencies that shall be deemed equivalent to courses of instruction given by higher educational institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 305, Sec. 29.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13630.

The state board is the state agency which is authorized to represent the state and its local governmental agencies in administering any federal or state funds available for wastewater treatment plant operator training. The state board may provide technical and financial assistance to organizations providing operator training programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 422, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13631.

Prior to adopting or amending any regulations or approving any courses for operator training, the state board shall appoint an advisory committee to assist it in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 420, Sec. 3.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

13632.

The advisory committee appointed pursuant to Section 13631 shall consist of the following:

(a) Two persons from a statewide organization representing wastewater treatment plant operators who shall be employed at a wastewater treatment plant as operators.

(b) Two persons from statewide organizations representing municipalities, including counties or private utility wastewater treatment plants.

(c) Two persons from statewide organizations representing local sanitation agencies, other than agencies specified in subdivision (b).

(d) One person who is employed as an operator at a water recycling
 treatment plant.

(e) One person from an educational institution’s school or division of engineering.

(f) One person who is a member of an organized labor union that represents wastewater treatment plant operators.

(g) One person who is a professional engineer specializing in sanitary engineering.

(h) One person who is an active or former member of the United States military who is working, supervising, or managing or who has previously worked, supervised, or managed in wastewater treatment or distribution within their military service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 760, Sec. 4.   (AB 1588)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13633.

The advisory committee shall review all proposed regulations and make recommendations to the state board prior to adoption of any regulations or amendments thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 420, Sec. 3.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Water Wells and Cathodic Protection Wells [13700. - 13806.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration of Policy [13700. - 13701.]

13700.

The Legislature finds that the greater portion of the water used in this state is obtained from underground sources and that those waters are subject to impairment in quality and purity, causing detriment to the health, safety and welfare of the people of the state. The Legislature therefore declares that the people of the state have a primary interest in the location, construction, maintenance, abandonment, and destruction of water wells, cathodic protection wells, groundwater monitoring wells, and geothermal heat exchange wells, which activities directly affect the quality and purity of underground waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13701.
